Utah statutes.
19-4-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Board" means the Drinking Water Board appointed under Section 19-4-103.

(2)  "Contaminant" means a physical, chemical, biological, or radiological substance or matter in water.

(3)  "Director" means the director of the Division of Drinking Water.

(4)  "Division" means the Division of Drinking Water, created in Subsection 19-1-105(1)(b).

(5) (a)  "Groundwater source" means an underground opening from or through which groundwater flows or is pumped from a subsurface water-bearing formation.

(b)  "Groundwater source" includes:

(i)  a well;

(ii)  a spring;

(iii)  a tunnel; or

(iv)  an adit.

(6)  "Maximum contaminant level" means the maximum permissible level of a contaminant in water that is delivered to a user of a public water system.

(7) (a)  "Public water system" means a system providing water for human consumption and other domestic uses that:

(i)  has at least 15 service connections; or

(ii)  serves an average of 25 individuals daily for at least 60 days of the year.

(b)  "Public water system" includes:

(i)  a collection, treatment, storage, or distribution facility under the control of the operator and used primarily in connection with the system; and

(ii)  a collection, pretreatment, or storage facility used primarily in connection with the system but not under the operator's control.

(8)  "Retail water supplier" means a person that:

(a)  supplies water for human consumption and other domestic uses to an end user; and

(b)  has more than 500 service connections.

(9)  "Supplier" means a person who owns or operates a public water system.

(10)  "Wholesale water supplier" means a person that provides most of that person's water to a retail water supplier.



Amended by Chapter 360, 2012 General Session

